Utah statutes.
73-11-3.   Disposition of proceeds.
The money derived from the sale or lease of such excess stock shall go to the
reservoir land grant fund until the principal of the loan or loans made to the
Carbon Water Company, or its predecessors, the interest thereon, and advances
made by the state in connection therewith, are fully paid, and thereafter the
money derived from the sale or lease of said stock go to the state school
fund.
